dictionaries/sk_SK/src/Slovak.aff
SFX D   0           iach       [inr]ž is:locative is:plural
SFX D   0           iach       [loruy]č is:locative is:plural
SFX D   0           iach       o[šž] is:locative is:plural
SFX D   0           iach       rň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   0           iach       [ud][šzž] is:locative is:plural
SFX D   0           iach       [^i][ae]ž is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ď           diach      [eoru]ď is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ď           diach      [^i]aď is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ň           niach      lebeň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ň           niach      [alou]ň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ň           niach      čeň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ň           niach      jeseň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ň           niach      [^á]leň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ň           ňach       ieň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          niach      hlbeň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          niach      [^e]deň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          niach      iaheň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          niach      [^ij][^á]seň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          niach      veň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          niach      izeň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          niach      [^i]areň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          niach      [^i]ereň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          niach      dreň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          niach      uheň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          ňach       edeň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          ňach       á[ršl]eň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          ňach       ieseň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          ňach       [áýí]zeň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          ňach       priazeň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          ňach       báseň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eň          ňach       i[ae]reň is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ľ           liach      [^s][ye][ľ] is:locative is:plural
SFX D   el          liach      sel is:locative is:plural
SFX D   eľ          liach      myseľ is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ec          ciach      ec is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ec          cami       ec is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   0           ami        ď is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   eľ          ľami       seľ is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   0           ami        [^s]eľ is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   eň          ňami       [bdhrsšzv]eň is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   eň          ňami       á[lš]eň is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   eň          ňami       i[aeu].eň is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   ň           ňami       [^á][lš]eň is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   ň           ňami       [^bdhlrsšzv]eň is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   ň           ňami       [^e]ň is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   0           ami        ť is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   0           ami        [^acďľňť] is:instrumental is:plural

SFX K Y 37
SFX K   ď           di         ď is:genitive
SFX K   ť           ti         ť is:genitive
SFX K   ň           ni         ň is:genitive
SFX K   0           i          [^áďťňľ] is:genitive
SFX K   0           i          [^áďťňľ] is:dative
SFX K   ť           ti         ť is:dative
SFX K   á           ej         á is:dative
SFX K   0           0          . is:accusative
SFX K   á           ú          á is:accusative
SFX K   ľ           li         ľ is:locative
SFX K   á           ou         á is:instrumental
SFX K   0           ou         [^á] is:instrumental
SFX K   0           i          [^áďťňľ] is:nominative is:plural
SFX K   ť           ti         ť is:nominative is:plural
SFX K   á           é          á is:nominative is:plural
SFX K   iná         ín         iná is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   ď           dí         ď is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   ľ           lí         ľ is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   ť           tí         ť is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   ň           ní         ň is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   0           í          [^áďťňľ] is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   á           ám         á is:dative is:plural
SFX K   ď           diam       ď is:dative is:plural
SFX K   ľ           liam       ľ is:dative is:plural
SFX K   ť           tiam       ť is:dative is:plural
SFX K   ň           niam       ň is:dative is:plural
SFX K   0           iam        [^áďťňľ] is:dative is:plural
SFX K   0           i          [^áďťňľ] is:accusative is:plural
SFX K   ť           ti         ť is:accusative is:plural
SFX K   á           ách        á is:locative is:plural
SFX K   ď           diach      ď is:locative is:plural
SFX K   ľ           liach      ľ is:locative is:plural
SFX K   ť           tiach      ť is:locative is:plural
SFX K   ň           niach      ň is:locative is:plural
SFX K   0           iach       [^áďťňľ] is:locative is:plural
SFX K   á           ami        á is:instrumental is:plural
SFX K   0           ami        [^á] is:instrumental is:plural
